Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-333
Historical vehicle, defined.

Historical vehicle means a motor vehicle or trailer which is thirty or more years old, which is essentially unaltered from the original manufacturer's specifications, and which is, because of its significance, being collected, preserved, restored, or maintained by a collector as a leisure pursuit.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 33;

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 22;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 25.